California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
To provide revenues for the district, at any time prior to the formation of the district, or after the formation of the district and prior to the appointment of a commission, the legislative body conducting the proceeding for the formation of the district may enter into a contract or lease with any owner or tenant of property in the district under which the owner or tenant, for a specified rental or other consideration and for a specified period not exceeding 10 years, reserves a reasonable proportion or number of parking spaces in a parking place of the district for the use of the owner or tenant of such property, the employees of the owner or tenant performing services on the property, and the customers of, or other classes of persons designated by, the owner or tenant and entering the property as invitees or otherwise. After the appointment of a commission, the commission may make such contracts or leases.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

35573.

If the petition for the formation of a district under this part expressly so authorizes, at any time and following a hearing after such notice as the legislative body prescribes, it may determine that no parking place commission shall be appointed for such district, or if the commission has been appointed, may dissolve the commission. In either event, the legislative body shall thereafter have all powers, jurisdiction, and authority granted to, and all duties imposed upon, the commission pursuant to this part. The legislative body at any time thereafter may appoint or reappoint a commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Miscellaneous [35700. - 35708.]

35700.

Notwithstanding any agreement made pursuant to this part, as a covenant to bondholders or otherwise, to maintain parking meters on specified public ways in the district, parking meters need not be maintained:

(a) On any public way which has become a “freeway” or a “state highway” as defined in Sections 23.5 and 24.

(b) At any time and so long as both (1) the net revenues from the parking places of the district during each of the two next previous fiscal years and available for the payment of principal and interest on the bonds of the district equaled or exceeded one and one-half times the principal and interest which has or will come due during the current fiscal year, and (2) the money in the fund to pay principal and interest on the bonds equals or exceeds all amounts coming due on principal and interest during the next following 12 months.

(c) At any time and so long as the money in the fund to pay principal and interest on the bonds of the district equals the total of the outstanding bonds and interest thereon to maturity.

(d) At any time after the bonds of the district and the interest thereon have been fully paid.

(e) On a public way, or portion thereof, if the holders of not less than sixty percent (60%) of the outstanding bonds have agreed in writing that the maintenance of parking meters on the public way, or portion thereof, may be discontinued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

35701.

Any agreement to maintain parking meters on a public way shall not affect the right of a city, acting by virtue of its police power, to control, regulate, or prohibit the parking of vehicles on any public way, or portion thereof, to the extent necessary to protect the public safety.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

35702.

All property acquired pursuant to this part shall be condemned or acquired in the name of the city, and title to such property shall be in the city, subject to the provisions of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

35703.

In instances where a district is formed under this part in any charter city, if under the provisions of the charter any power, jurisdiction, authority or duty cannot be performed or exercised in the manner, or by the body or officer, prescribed in this part, such power, jurisdiction, authority or duty shall be performed or exercised in the manner, or by the body or officer, prescribed by such charter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 256.)
-------------------------------------------

35704.

As long as any of the bonds of the district or any interest thereon remains unpaid, the parking places acquired for the district shall be used as public parking places unless the legislative body makes the determination provided in Section 35706.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1283.)
-------------------------------------------

35705.

After the bonds of the district and all interest thereon have been paid the property shall continue to be used as public parking places. However, such use may be discontinued as to such property or any portion thereof if the legislative body, after public hearing following such notice thereof as the legislative body may prescribe, determines by a four-fifths vote of all its members that the public interest and necessity and the needs of the district no longer require that such property, or such portion thereof, be used as public parking places. Thereafter the property as to which such determination is made may be used by the city for any public purpose or it may be sold as other city property is sold when no longer needed for a public purpose. If any ad valorem assessment has been levied upon the real property in the district as provided in this part, then the proceeds of such sale shall be used to make refund of such assessments to the then owner of each parcel of real property which has been so assessed in the proportion which the total assessments levied upon such parcel bears to the total of all such assessments, but no refund as to any parcel shall exceed the total assessments theretofore paid in respect of said parcel, and any portion of the proceeds remaining after such refunds have been made shall be placed in the general fund of the city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 256.)
-------------------------------------------

35706.

As an alternative to the provisions of Section 35705, and to the extent authorized in the covenants contained in the ordinance, resolution or indenture providing for the issuance of the bonds, the use of any of the properties as public parking places may be discontinued as to such property or any portion thereof if the legislative body, after public hearing following notice thereof published pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code in one or more newspapers circulated in the city at least ten (10) days before said hearing, determines by a four-fifths vote of all its members that the public interest and necessity and the needs of the district no longer require that such property, or such portion thereof, be used as public parking places. Thereafter the property as to which such determination is made may be used by the city for any public purpose or may be sold as other city property is sold when no longer needed for a public purpose. The proceeds of such sale shall be used as provided in said covenants.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 357.)
-------------------------------------------

35707.

All claims for money or damages against the district are governed by Part 3 (commencing with Section 900) and Part 4 (commencing with Section 940) of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code except as provided therein, or by other statutes or regulations expressly applicable thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1715.)
-------------------------------------------

35708.

At any time following the formation of a district under this part and the issuance of the initial issue of bonds, any parcel of land may be added to the district if the owner of such parcel files with the legislative body a petition for such inclusion and the legislative body grants such petition. The legislative body shall not grant such petition until the petition has been approved by the parking place commission of the district and until a determination has been made by the legislative body and approved by the parking place commission as to the amount, if any, to be paid by such petitioner as an annexation fee and until the owner of such parcel has paid to the city such total fee, if any. The amount paid to the city shall be placed in the fund in which the proceeds of an ad valorem assessment would be placed. If such petition is granted, such parcel shall thereafter be entitled to the same rights as those which apply to other lands in the district and shall be subject to all ad valorem assessments thereafter levied in the district under this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1775.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 5. PARKING AND BUSINESS IMPROVEMENT AREA LAW OF 1965 [36000. - 36081.]



  CHAPTER 1. General [36000. - 36004.]

36000.

The purpose of this part is to authorize cities to impose a tax on businesses within a parking and business improvement area which is in addition to the general business license tax, if any, in the city, and to use such proceeds for the following purposes:

(a) The acquisition, construction or maintenance of parking facilities for the benefit of the area.

(b) Decoration of any public place in the area.

(c) Promotion of public events which are to take place on or in public places in the area.

(d) Furnishing of music in any public place in the area.

(e) The general promotion of retail trade activities in the area.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 241.)
-------------------------------------------

36001.

“Parking and business improvement area” or “area” as used in this part means an area designated as provided in this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 241.)
-------------------------------------------

36002.

“Business” as used in this part means all types of business, including professions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 241.)
-------------------------------------------

36003.

The city council shall have sole discretion as to how the revenue derived from the tax is to be used within the scope of the above purposes; however, the city council may appoint existing advisory boards or commissions to make recommendations as to its use, or the council may create a new advisory board or commission for the purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 241.)
-------------------------------------------

36004.

This part is intended to be construed liberally and in the event any provision thereof should be held invalid, the remaining provisions shall remain in full force and effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 241.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Establishment [36020. - 36027.]

36020.

A parking and business improvement area may be established as provided in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 241.)
-------------------------------------------

36021.

The city council shall adopt a resolution of intention to establish an area. The resolution shall contain the following information:

(a) Description of the boundaries of the proposed area;

(b) The time and place of a hearing to be held by the council to consider establishment of an area;

(c) The proposed uses to which the proposed revenue shall be put; and

(d) The initial or additional rate or levy, of the license tax, with a breakdown by class of business if such classification is to be used.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1175.)
-------------------------------------------

36022.

Notice of a hearing held under Section 36021, 36061, or 36080 shall be given by both of the following:

(a) One publication of the resolution of intention in a newspaper of general circulation in the city.

(b) Mailing a complete copy of the resolution of intention to each business in the proposed, or established, area. Publication and mailing shall be completed at least 10 days prior to the time of the hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 193, Sec. 140.)
-------------------------------------------

36023.

Whenever a hearing is held under this part, the city council shall hear all protests and receive evidence for or against the proposed action; the council shall also rule upon all protests which determination shall be final; and the council may continue the hearing from time to time. Proceedings shall terminate if protest is made by businesses in the proposed area which (1) pay a majority of the taxes within the area under the general business license tax, or (2) if there is no general business license tax, would pay a majority of the taxes within the area under the proposed tax.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1175.)
-------------------------------------------

36024.

If the council decides to change the boundaries of the proposed area, the hearing shall be continued to a time at least 15 days after such decision and notice shall be given as prescribed in Section 36022, showing the boundary amendments, but no resolution of intention is required.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 241.)
-------------------------------------------

36025.

If the council, following the hearing, decides to establish the proposed area, it shall adopt an ordinance to that effect. This ordinance shall contain the following information:

(a) The number, date and title of the resolution of intention pursuant to which it was adopted;

(b) The time and place the hearing was held concerning the formation of such area;

(c) The description of the boundaries of such area;

(d) A statement that the businesses in the area established by the ordinance shall be subject to the provisions of the tax or additional tax provided by this part;

(e) The initial or additional rate or levy, of the license tax to be imposed with a breakdown by classification of business, if such classification is used; and

(f) A statement that a parking and business improvement area has been established.

(g) The uses to which the revenue shall be put.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1175.)
-------------------------------------------

36026.

The city council may, for each of the purposes set out in Section 36000, establish and modify one or more separate benefit zones based upon the degree of benefit derived from the purpose and may impose a different rate of tax within each such benefit zone.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1175.)
-------------------------------------------

36027.

All provisions of this part applicable to establishment or disestablishment of an area also apply to the establishment, modification, or disestablishment of benefit zones pursuant to Section 36026. The establishment or the modification of any such zone shall follow the same procedure as provided for the establishment of a parking and business improvement area and the disestablishment shall follow the same procedure as provided for disestablishment of an area.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1175.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Classification of Businesses [36040. - 36041.]

36040.

For purposes of the tax or additional tax to be imposed pursuant to this part, the city council may make a reasonable classification of businesses, giving consideration to various factors, including the degree of benefit received from parking only.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1175.)
-------------------------------------------

36041.

Businesses recently established in the area may be exempted from the tax, imposed pursuant to this part, for a period not exceeding one year from the date they commenced business in the area.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 241.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Taxation [36060. - 36063.]

36060.

The collection of the tax imposed pursuant to this part shall be made at the same time and in the same manner as any other business license tax or in such other manner as the city council shall determine.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 241.)
-------------------------------------------

36061.

Changes may be made in the rate or additional rate or levy or in the uses to which the revenue shall be put as specified in the ordinance establishing the area, by ordinance adopted after a hearing before the city council.

The city council shall adopt a resolution of intention to change the rate or additional rate or levy or the uses to which the revenue shall be put at least 15 days prior to the hearing required by this section. This resolution shall specify the proposed change and shall give the time and place of the hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1175.)
-------------------------------------------

36062.

The tax need not be imposed on different classes, established pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 36040) of the business on the same basis or at the same rate; provided, however, that the tax imposed for the purpose of the acquisition, construction or maintenance of parking facilities for the benefit of the area shall be imposed on the basis of benefit determined by the city council after giving consideration to the total cost to be recovered from the businesses upon which the tax is to be imposed, the total area within the boundaries of the parking and business improvement area, the assessed value of the land and improvements within the area, the total business volume generated within the area, and such other factors as the city council may find and determine to be a reasonable measure of such benefit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1175.)
-------------------------------------------

36063.

The tax levied hereunder must be for the purposes specified in the ordinances and the proceeds shall not be used for any other purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 241.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Disestablishment [36080. - 36081.]

36080.

The city council may disestablish an area by ordinance after a hearing before the city council.

The city council shall adopt a resolution of intention to disestablish the area at least 15 days prior to the hearing required by this section. The resolution shall give the time and place of the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 241.)
-------------------------------------------

36081.

Upon disestablishment of an area, any proceeds of the tax, or assets acquired with such proceeds, shall be subject to disposition as the city council shall determine.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 241.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 6. PARKING AND BUSINESS IMPROVEMENT AREA LAW OF 1989 [36500. - 36551.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [36500. - 36515.]



  ARTICLE 1. Declarations [36500. - 36504.]

36500.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Parking and Business Improvement Area Law of 1989.”

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 591, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

36501.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that businesses located and operating within the business districts of this state’s communities are economically disadvantaged, are underutilized, and are unable to attract customers due to inadequate facilities, services, and activities in the business districts. 

(b) The Legislature also finds and declares that it is in the public interest to promote the economic revitalization and physical maintenance of the business districts of its cities in order to create jobs, attract new businesses, and prevent erosion of the business districts. 

(c) The Legislature also finds that it is of particular local benefit to allow cities to fund property related improvements and activities through the levy of assessments upon the businesses which benefit from those improvements and activities. 

(d) The Legislature also finds and declares that tourism is a large and growing contributor to California’s economy, and that promotion of a city’s or county’s scenic, recreational, cultural, and other attractions as a tourist destination is an important public purpose. 

(e) The Legislature also finds and declares that assessments levied for the purpose of providing improvements and promoting activities which benefit individual businesses may also benefit the property within the area directly or indirectly and that those assessments are not taxes for the general benefit of a city, but are assessments for the improvements and activities which confer special benefits upon the businesses for which the improvements and activities are provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1110, Sec. 40.)
-------------------------------------------

36502.

The purpose of this part is to recodify and supplant previously enacted provisions of law which authorize cities to levy assessments on businesses within a parking and business improvement area and to provide a uniform procedure to levy assessments for improvements and activities of businesses located and operating in a business district of a city. This part does not affect or limit any other provisions of law authorizing or providing for the furnishing of improvements or activities or the raising of revenue for these purposes. In addition, this part is intended to provide a method for financing public programs to attract tourist visits to areas where tourism is economically important and desired.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1110, Sec. 41.)
-------------------------------------------

36503.

Any provision of this part which conflicts with any other provision of law shall prevail over the other provision of law.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 591, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

36504.

This part is intended to be construed liberally and, if any provision is held invalid, the remaining provisions shall remain in full force and effect. If the provisions of this part respecting the levying of assessments are held invalid in any area within which assessments have been levied pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 36530), the assessments shall be reimposed in an identical amount and upon the same businesses as a matter of law and no lapse in the levy of any assessment shall be deemed to have occurred. Assessments levied under this part are not special taxes.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 591, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [36505. - 36513.]

36505.

“Advisory board” means the advisory board or commission appointed by the city council pursuant to Section 36530.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 591, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

36506.

“Assessment” means a levy for the purpose of acquiring, constructing, installing, or maintaining improvements and promoting activities which will benefit the businesses located and operating within a parking and business improvement area.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 591, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

36507.

“Business” means all types of businesses and includes financial institutions and professions.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 591, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

36508.

“City” means a city, county, city and county, or an agency or entity created pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 5 of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the public member agencies of which include only cities, counties, or a city and county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1110, Sec. 42.)
-------------------------------------------

36509.

“City council” means the city council of a city or the board of supervisors of a county, or the agency, commission, or board created pursuant to a joint powers agreement and which is a city within the meaning of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1110, Sec. 43.)
-------------------------------------------

36509.5.

“Clerk” means clerk of the legislative body.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 269, Sec. 37.   (SB 184)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

36510.

“Improvement” means the acquisition, construction, installation, or maintenance of any tangible property with an estimated useful life of five years or more including, but not limited to, the following:

(a) Parking facilities.

(b) Benches.

(c) Trash receptacles.

(d) Street lighting.

(e) Decorations.

(f) Parks.

(g) Fountains.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 591, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

36511.

“Parking and business improvement area,” or “area,” means an area designated as provided in this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 591, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

36512.

“Property” means real property situated within an area.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 591, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

36513.

“Activities” means, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(a) Promotion of public events which benefit businesses in the area and which take place on or in public places within the area. 

(b) Furnishing of music in any public place in the area. 

(c) Promotion of tourism within the area. 

(d) Activities which benefit businesses located and operating in the area.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1110, Sec. 44.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Prior Law [36515. - 36515.]

36515.

Every improvement area established prior to January 1, 1990, pursuant to the Parking and Business Improvement Area Law of 1979 (former Part 6 (commencing with Section 36500) of this division) is hereby declared valid and effective and is unaffected by the repeal of that law, but is subject to Chapters 3 (commencing with Section 36530), 4 (commencing with Section 36540), and 5 (commencing with Section 36550) of this part rather than any provision of prior law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 591, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Establishment [36520. - 36529.]

36520.

A parking and business improvement area may be established as provided in this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 591, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

36521.

The city council may establish an area on its own initiative.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 591, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

36521.5.

A county may not form an area within the territorial jurisdiction of a city without the consent of the city council of that city. A city may not form an area within the unincorporated territory of a county, without the consent of the board of supervisors of that county. A city may not form an area within the territorial jurisdiction of another city without the consent of the city council of the other city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1110, Sec. 45.)
-------------------------------------------

36522.

Proceedings to establish a parking and business improvement area shall be instituted by the adoption by the city council of a resolution of intention to establish the area. The resolution of intention shall do all of the following:

(a) State that a parking and business improvement area is proposed to be established pursuant to this chapter and describe the boundaries of the territory proposed to be included in the area and the boundaries of each separate benefit zone to be established within the area. The boundaries of the area may be described by reference to a map on file in the office of the clerk, showing the proposed area.

(b) State the
 name of the proposed area.

(c) State the type or types of improvements and activities proposed to be funded by the levy of assessments on businesses in the area. The resolution of intention shall specify any improvements to be acquired.

(d) State that, except where funds are otherwise available, an assessment will be levied annually to pay for all improvements and activities within the area.

(e) State the proposed method and basis of levying the assessment in sufficient detail to allow each business owner to estimate the amount of the assessment to be levied against his or her business.

(f) State whether new businesses will be exempt from the levy of the assessment, pursuant to Section 36531.

(g) Fix a time and place for a public hearing on the establishment of the parking and business improvement area and the levy of assessments, which shall be consistent with the requirements of Section 54954.6 of the Government Code.

(h) State that at the hearing the testimony of all interested persons for or against the establishment of the area, the extent of the area, or the furnishing of specified types of improvements or activities will be heard.

(i) Describe, in summary, the effect of protests made by business owners against the establishment of the area, the extent of the area, and the furnishing of a specified type of improvement or activity, as provided in Section 36524.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 382, Sec. 14.   (SB 194)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

36523.

Notice of a public hearing held under Section 36524, 36541, 36542, or 36550 shall be given by both of the following:

(a) Publishing the resolution of intention in a newspaper of general circulation in the city once, for at least seven days before the public hearing.

(b) Mailing of a complete copy of the resolution of intention by first-class mail to each business owner in the area within seven days of the city council’s adoption of the resolution of intention.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), in the case of an area established primarily to promote tourism, a copy of the resolution of intention shall be mailed by first-class mail within seven days of the city council’s adoption of the resolution of intention, to the owner of each business in the area which will be subject to assessment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1194, Sec. 25.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

36523.5.

Notwithstanding Section 36523, prior to adopting any new or increased assessment, the city council shall give notice pursuant to Section 54954.6 of the Government Code in lieu of publishing notice pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 36523.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1194, Sec. 26.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

36524.

(a) At the public hearing, the city council shall hear and consider all protests against the establishment of the area, the extent of the area, or the furnishing of specified types of improvements or activities within the area. A protest may be made orally or in writing by any interested person. Any protest pertaining to the regularity or sufficiency of the proceedings shall be in writing and shall clearly set forth the irregularity or defect to which the objection is made.

(b) Every written protest shall be filed with the clerk at or before the time fixed for the public hearing. The city council may waive any irregularity in the form or content of any written protest and at the public hearing may correct minor defects in the proceedings. A written protest may be withdrawn in writing at any time before the conclusion of the public hearing.

(c) Each written protest shall contain a description of the business in which the person subscribing the protest is interested sufficient to identify the business and, if a person subscribing is not shown on the official records of the city as the owner of the business, the protest shall contain or be accompanied by written evidence that the person subscribing is the owner of the business. A written protest which does not comply with this section shall not be counted in determining a majority protest.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 591, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

36525.

(a) If written protests are received from the owners of businesses in the proposed area which will pay 50 percent or more of the assessments proposed to be levied and protests are not withdrawn so as to reduce the protests to less than that 50 percent, no further proceedings to create the specified parking and business improvement area or to levy the proposed assessment, as contained in the resolution of intention, shall be taken for a period of one year from the date of the finding of a majority protest by the city council. 

(b) If the majority protest is only against the furnishing of a specified type or types of improvement or activity within the area, those types of improvements or activities shall be eliminated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1110, Sec. 47.)
-------------------------------------------

36526.

(a) At the conclusion of the public hearing to establish the area, the city council may adopt, revise, change, reduce, or modify the proposed assessment or the type or types of improvements and activities to be funded with the revenues from the assessments. 

(b) At the public hearing, the city council may only make changes in, to, or from, the boundaries of the proposed parking and business improvement area that will exclude territory which will not benefit from the proposed improvements or activities. However, proposed assessments may only be revised by reducing any or all of them. 

(c) The city council shall not change the boundaries of the area to include any territory that will not, in its judgment, benefit by the improvement or activity. Any addition of territory to the proposed boundaries of the area may be made only upon notice to the owners of the businesses proposed to be added to the area, as provided in Section 36523, and upon a public hearing on the addition of territory, as provided in Section 36524.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1110, Sec. 48.)
-------------------------------------------

36527.

If the city council, following the public hearing, decides to establish the proposed parking and business improvement area, it shall adopt an ordinance to that effect. The ordinance shall contain all of the following:

(a) The number, date of adoption, and title of the resolution of intention. 

(b) The time and place where the public hearing was held concerning the establishment of the area. 

(c) A determination regarding any protests received at the public hearing. 

(d) The description of the boundaries of the area and of each separate benefit zone established within the area. 

(e) A statement that a parking and business improvement area has been established and the name of the area. 

(f) A statement that the businesses in the area established by the ordinance shall be subject to any amendments to this part. 

(g) The description of the method and basis of levying the assessments, with a breakdown by classification of businesses if a classification is used. 

(h) A statement that the improvements and activities to be provided in the area will be funded by the levy of the assessments. The revenue from the levy of assessments within an area shall not be used to provide improvements or activities outside the area or for any purpose other than the purposes specified in the resolution of intention, as modified by the city council at the hearing concerning establishment of the area. 

(i) A finding that the businesses and the property within the business and improvement area will be benefited by the improvements and activities funded by the assessments proposed to be levied. In the case of an area formed to promote tourism, only businesses that benefit from tourist visits may be assessed. 

(j) The time and manner of collecting the assessments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1110, Sec. 49.)
-------------------------------------------

36528.

The city council may establish one or more separate benefit zones within the area based upon the degree of benefit derived from the improvements or activities to be provided within the benefit zone and may impose a different assessment within each benefit zone.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 591, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

36529.

All provisions of this part applicable to the establishment, modification, or disestablishment of a parking and business improvement area apply to the establishment, modification, or disestablishment of benefit zones. The city council shall, to establish, modify, or disestablish a benefit zone, follow the procedure to establish, modify, or disestablish a parking and business improvement area.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 591, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Assessments [36530. - 36538.]

36530.

The city council shall appoint an advisory board which shall make a recommendation to the city council on the expenditure of revenues derived from the levy of assessments pursuant to this part, on the classification of businesses, as applicable, and on the method and basis of levying the assessments. The city council may designate existing advisory boards or commissions to serve as the advisory board for the area or may create a new advisory board for that purpose. The city council may limit membership of the advisory board to persons paying the assessments under this part. The city council may appoint the advisory board prior to adoption of the resolution of intention to create the area, so that the advisory board may recommend the provisions of the resolution of intention.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1110, Sec. 50.)
-------------------------------------------

36531.

The city council may exempt a business recently established in the area from the levy of the assessments, for a period not to exceed one year from the date the business commenced operating in the area. The city council shall state its determination to so exempt new businesses in the resolution of intention to establish the area and shall reaffirm its determination annually in the resolution of intention required to be adopted pursuant to Section 36534.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 591, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

36532.

The collection of the assessments levied pursuant to this part shall be made at the time and in the manner set forth by the city council in the ordinance establishing the area.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 591, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

36533.

(a) The advisory board shall cause to be prepared a report for each fiscal year for which assessments are to be levied and collected to pay the costs of the improvements and activities described in the report. The report may propose changes, including, but not limited to, the boundaries of the parking and business improvement area or any benefit zones within the area, the basis and method of levying the assessments, and any changes in the classification of businesses, if a classification is used.

(b) The report shall be filed with the clerk and shall refer to the parking and business improvement area by name, specify the fiscal year to which the report applies, and, with respect to that fiscal year, shall contain all of the following:

(1) Any proposed changes in the boundaries of the parking and business improvement area or in any benefit zones within the area.

(2) The improvements and activities to be provided for that fiscal year.

(3) An estimate of the cost of providing the improvements and the activities for that fiscal year.

(4) The method and basis of levying the assessment in sufficient detail to allow each business owner to estimate the amount of the assessment to be levied against his or her business for that fiscal year.
